Hawaii, session 2026, GM1341.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1, The purpose of this Act is to update references
to the United States Code in the interstate compact on
educational opportunity for military children.
SECTION 2. Section 311D-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending articles II and III to read as follows:
"ARTICLE II
DEFINITIONS
As used in this compact, unless the context clearly
requires a different construction:
"Active duty" means full-time duty status in the active
uniformed service of the United States, including members of the
national guard and reserve on active duty orders pursuant to
title 10 United States Code [section 101(d) (1)—and section
101 (d) (6)- (A) . ] chapters 1209 and 1211.
"Appropriate education agency" means a public authority
legally constituted by a state as an administrative agency to
2026-2790 SB3118 HD2 HMSO
lll■lnlllllHlllilOlilllll

Page 2 S.B. NO. s"
provide control of and direction for kindergarten through
twelfth grade public educational institutions.
"Children of military families" means school-aged children,
enrolled in kindergarten through twelfth grade, in the
households of active duty members.
"Compact" means the interstate compact on educational
opportunity for military children.
"Compact commissioner" means the voting representative of
each compacting state appointed pursuant to article VIII of this
compact.
"Deployment" means the period of three months prior to the
service members' departure from their home station on military
orders through six months after return to their home station.
"Education records" means those official records, files,
and data directly related to a student and maintained by the
school or appropriate education agency, including records
encompassing all the material kept in the student's 'cumulative
folder such as general identifying data, records of attendance
and of academic work completed, records of achievement and
results of evaluative tests, health data, disciplinary status,
test protocols, and individualized education programs.
2026-2790 SB3118 HD2 HMSO
liiiHiiiiiiiiiimiiiii

Page 3 S.B. NO.
"Extracurricular activities" means a voluntary activity
sponsored by the school or appropriate education agency or an
organization sanctioned by the appropriate education agency,
^^Extracurricular activities^ [inelude] includes preparation for
and involvement in public performances, contests, athletic
competitions, demonstrations, displays, and club activities,
"Interstate commission on educational opportunity for
military children" or "interstate commission" means the
commission that is created under article IX of this compact,
"Local education agency" means a public authority legally
constituted by a state as an administrative agency to provide
control of and direction for kindergarten through twelfth grade
public educational institutions.
"Member state" means a state that has enacted this compact.
"Military installation" means a base, camp, post, station,
yard, center, homeport facility for any ship, or other facility
under the jurisdiction of the United States Department of
Defense, including any leased facility, which is located within
any of the several states, the District of Columbia, the
Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands,
Guam, American Samoa, the Northern Marianas Islands, and any
2026-2790 SB3118 HD2 HMSO
uiiiiiiiNiimiiiiiii

Page 4
S.B. NO.
other United States territory. [■T-ho--torm shall] "Military
installation" does not include any facility used primarily for
civil works, rivers and harbors projects, or flood control
projects.
"Non-meraber state" means a state that has not enacted this
compact.
"Receiving state" means the state to which a child of a
military family is sent, brought, or caused to be sent or
brought.
"Rule" means a written statement by the interstate
commission promulgated pursuant to article XII of this compact
that is of general applicability, implements, interprets, or
prescribes a policy or provision of the compact, or an
organizational, procedural, or practice requirement of the
interstate commission, has the force and effect of statutory law
in a member state, and includes the amendment, repeal, or
suspension of an existing rule.
"Sending state" means the state from which a child of a
military family is sent, brought, or caused to be sent or
brought.
2026-2790 SB3118 HD2 HMSO

Page 5
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
"State" means a state of the United States, the District of
Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the United States
Virgin Islands, Guam, American Samoa, the Northern Marianas
Islands, and any other United States territory.
"Student" means the child of a military family for whom the
local education agency receives public funding and who is
formally enrolled in kindergarten through twelfth grade.
"Student financial obligation" means any unpaid or
outstanding fines or fees.
"Transition" means the formal and physical process of
transferring from school to school, or the period of time in
which a student moves from one school in the sending state to
another school in the receiving state.
"Uniformed service" means the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine
Corps, Coast Guard as well as the Commissioned Corps of the
National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, and Public
Health Services.
"Veteran" means a person who served in the uniformed
services and who was discharged or released therefrom under
honorable conditions.
ARTICLE III
2026-2790 SB3118 HD2 HMSO 5
ffliiiiniiiMiiniiiiii

Page 6
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
APPLICABILITY
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), this
compact shall apply to the children of:
(1) Active duty members of the uniformed services as
defined in this compact, including members of the
national guard and military reserves on active duty
orders pursuant to tit]^ 10 United States Code
[oGGtion 101(d) (1)—and-OGCtion 101(d)(6)(A);] chapters
1209 and 1211;
(2) Members or veterans of the uniformed services who are
severely injured and medically discharged or retired,
for a period of one year after medical discharge or
retirement; and
(3) Members of the uniformed services who die while on
active duty or as a result of injuries sustained while
on active duty, for a period of one year after death.
(b) This interstate compact shall only apply to
appropriate education agencies as defined in this compact.
(c) The provisions of this compact shall not apply to the
children of:
2026-2790 SB3118 HD2 HMSO

■IliillllllllMIIII

Page 7
S.B. NO.
(1) Inactive members of the national guard and military
reserves;
(2) Members of the uniformed services now retired, except
as provided in subsection (a) ;
(3) Veterans of the uniformed services, except as provided
in subsection (a); and
(4) Other United States Department of Defense personnel
and other federal agency civilian and contract
employees not defined as active duty members of the
uniformed services."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2790 SB3118 HD2 HMSO
iiiiiiminiiiiuiiiiiiiiiH

S.B. NO.
s"
' H.D. 2
APPROVED this 13th day of July ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B.No. 3118, S.D. 1,H.D.2
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date; May 1, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
President of the Senate
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 3118, SD 1,HD2
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE
STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 8, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives